Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-112.01
Restoration of civil rights; felon; procedure.

Any person sentenced to be punished for any felony, when the sentence is other than confinement in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility, shall be restored to such civil rights as enumerated or limited by the Board of Pardons upon receipt from the Board of Pardons of a warrant of discharge, which shall be issued by such board upon receiving from the sentencing court a certificate showing satisfaction of the judgment and sentence entered against such person.

Laws 1959, c. 117, § 2, p. 448;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 4.